Utah statutes.
7-1-105.   Procedures -- Adjudicative proceedings.
The commissioner and the department shall, except to the extent exempted,
comply with the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4,
Administrative Procedures Act, in their adjudicative proceedings.
